New Jersey, session 222, S770.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The Department of Health, in consultation with interested stakeholders, shall develop a best practices manual for prenatal and postpartum maternal care, which shall be designed to improve medical treatment for maternity patients. Each hospital and ambulatory care facility that provides care to maternity patients shall be required to adopt, and ensure compliance with, the best practices manual as a condition of licensure.  The best practices manual shall include, but shall not be limited to, requirements concerning:  simulation drills, obstetric response teams, screenings, treatment guidelines, the review and update of facility policies to facilitate implementation of these best practices, and the reporting of adverse events.  The department shall establish a system to revise and update the best practices manual as may be appropriate. b.   The Department of Health shall apply for and accept any grant of money from the State or federal government or other sources, which may be available to carry out the purposes of subsection a. of this section. 2.    There shall be appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health $950,000 for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2019 to carry out the purposes of subsection a. of section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.